Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.075

University of Washington fund—Other revenue for support of university.

No revenue from any source other than the general fund, which, except for the provisions hereof, would have been paid into the University of Washington fund, shall be used for any purpose except the support of the University of Washington.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.075. Prior: 1955 c 332 s 5.]